Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-519
License and registration; suspension for nonpayment of judgment; judgment satisfied; proof of financial responsibility.

Such license, registration and nonresident's operating privilege shall, except as provided in sections 60-521 to 60-523, remain so suspended and shall not be renewed, nor shall any such license or registration be thereafter issued in the name of such person, including any such person not previously licensed, unless and until every such judgment is stayed, satisfied or discharged, and until the said person gives proof of financial responsibility.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 19, p. 491;

Laws 1972, LB 1303, § 3.